csv2yaml/yaml_output/VTA_aw.yaml
     mikaw+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+2Pl+1Sg: MISSING
     mikaw+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: MISSING
     mikaw+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+2Pl+3SgProx/3PlProx: MISSING
     mikaw+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+2Sg+1Sg: MISSING
     mikaw+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: MISSING
     mikaw+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+2Sg+3SgProx/3PlProx: MISSING
     mikaw+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+2Sg/2Pl+Excl: MISSING
     mikaw+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+Incl+3PlProx: MISSING
     mikaw+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: MISSING
     mikaw+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+Incl+3SgProx: MISSING
     mikaw+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+2Pl+1Sg: MISSING
     mikaw+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: MISSING
     mikaw+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+2Pl+3SgProx/3PlProx: MISSING
     mikaw+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+2Sg+1Sg: MISSING
     mikaw+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: MISSING
     mikaw+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+2Sg+3SgProx/3PlProx: MISSING
     mikaw+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+2Sg/2Pl+Excl: MISSING
     mikaw+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+Incl+3PlProx: MISSING
     mikaw+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: MISSING
     mikaw+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+Incl+3SgProx: MISSING
     mikaw+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+2Pl+1Sg: MISSING
     mikaw+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: MISSING
     mikaw+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+2Pl+3SgProx/3PlProx: mikawik
     mikaw+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+2Sg+1Sg: mikawishin
     mikaw+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: MISSING
     mikaw+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+2Sg+3SgProx/3PlProx: mikaw
     mikaw+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+2Sg/2Pl+Excl: [mikawishinaan,mikawishinaang]
     mikaw+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+Incl+3PlProx: mikawaadaanig
     mikaw+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: MISSING
     mikaw+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+Incl+3SgProx: mikawaadaa
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+1Sg: nimikaagosiinaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+1Sg: nimikaagosiinaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+1Sg: gimikawisiimwaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+1Sg: gimikawisiinaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+1Sg: nimikaagosiidogenag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+1Sg: nimikaagosiidog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+1Sg: nimikaagoosiinaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+1Sg: nimikaagonaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+1Sg: nimikaagonaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+1Sg: gimikawimwaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+1Sg: gimikawinaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+1Sg: nimikaagodogenag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+1Sg: nimikaagodog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+1Sg: nimikaagoonaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+1Sg: nimikaagosiinan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+1Sg: nimikaagosiin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+1Sg: gimikawisiim
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+1Sg: gimikawisiin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+1Sg: nimikaagosiig
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+1Sg: nimikaagosiin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+1Sg: nimikaagoosiin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+1Sg: nimikaagonan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+1Sg: nimikaagon
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+1Sg: gimikawim
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+1Sg: gimikaw
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+1Sg: nimikaagoog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+1Sg: nimikaag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+1Sg: nimikaagoo
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+1Sg: nimikaagosiinaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+1Sg: nimikaagosiinaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+1Sg: gimikawisiimwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+1Sg: gimikawisiinaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+1Sg: nimikaagosiibaneg
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+1Sg: nimikaagosiiban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+1Sg: nimikaagoosiinaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+1Sg: nimikaagonaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+1Sg: nimikaagonaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+1Sg: gimikawimwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+1Sg: gimikawinaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+1Sg: nimikaagobaneg
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+1Sg: nimikaagoban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+1Sg: nimikaagoonaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+2Pl: gimikaagosiinaawaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+2Pl: gimikaagosiinaawaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+2Pl: gimikoosinooninimwaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+2Pl: gimikaagosiiwaadogenag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+2Pl: gimikaagosiiwaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+2Pl: gimikaagoosiimwaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+2Pl: gimikaagoosiimwaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+2Pl: gimikaagonaawaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+2Pl: gimikaagonaawaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+2Pl: gimikooninimwaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+2Pl: gimikaagowaadogenag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+2Pl: gimikaagowaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+2Pl: gimikaagoomwaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+2Pl: gimikaagoomwaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+2Pl: gimikaagosiinaawaan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+2Pl: gimikaagosiinaawaa
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+2Pl: gimikoosinooninim
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+2Pl: gimikaagosiiwaag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+2Pl: gimikaagosiiwaa
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+2Pl: gimikaagoosiim
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+2Pl: gimikaagoosiim
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+2Pl: gimikaagonaawaan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+2Pl: gimikaagonaawaa
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2Pl: gimikooninim
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+2Pl: gimikaagowaag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+2Pl: gimikaagowaa
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+2Pl: gimikaagoom
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+2Pl: gimikaagoom
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+2Pl: gimikaagosiinaawaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+2Pl: gimikaagosiinaawaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+2Pl: gimikoosinooninimwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+2Pl: gimikaagosiiwaabaneg
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+2Pl: gimikaagosiiwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+2Pl: gimikaagoosiimwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+2Pl: gimikaagoosiimwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+2Pl: gimikaagonaawaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+2Pl: gimikaagonaawaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+2Pl: gimikooninimwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+2Pl: gimikaagowaabaneg
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+2Pl: gimikaagowaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+2Pl: gimikaagoomwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+2Pl: gimikaagoomwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+2Sg: gimikaagosiinaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+2Sg: gimikaagosiinaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+2Sg: gimikoosinooninaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+2Sg: gimikaagosiidogenag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+2Sg: gimikaagosiidog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+2Sg: gimikaagoosiinaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+2Sg: gimikaagoosiinaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+2Sg: gimikaagonaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+2Sg: gimikaagonaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+2Sg: gimikooninaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+2Sg: gimikaagodogenag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+2Sg: gimikaagodog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+2Sg: gimikaagoonaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+2Sg: gimikaagoonaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+2Sg: gimikaagosiinan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+2Sg: gimikaagosiin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+2Sg: gimikoosinoon
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+2Sg: gimikaagosiig
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+2Sg: gimikaagosiin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+2Sg: gimikaagoosiin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+2Sg: gimikaagoosiin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+2Sg: gimikaagonan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+2Sg: gimikaagon
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2Sg: gimikoon
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+2Sg: gimikaagoog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+2Sg: gimikaag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+2Sg: gimikaagoo
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+2Sg: gimikaagoo
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+2Sg: gimikaagosiinaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+2Sg: gimikaagosiinaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+2Sg: gimikoosinooninaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+2Sg: gimikaagosiibaneg
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+2Sg: gimikaagosiiban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+2Sg: gimikaagoosiinaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+2Sg: gimikaagoosiinaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+2Sg: gimikaagonaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+2Sg: gimikaagonaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+2Sg: gimikooninaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+2Sg: gimikaagobaneg
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+2Sg: gimikaagoban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+2Sg: gimikaagoonaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+2Sg: gimikaagoonaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3PlObv: nimikawimaasiidogena'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3PlObv: gimikawimaasiwaawaadogena'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3PlObv: gimikawimaasiidogena'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+3PlObv: omikawaasiwaawaadogena'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+3PlObv: omikawaasiidogena'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+3PlObv: nimikawimaasiwaanaadogena'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+3PlObv: gimikawimaasiwaanaadogena'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+3PlObv: mikawimaasiidogena'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3PlObv: nimikawimaadogena'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3PlObv: gimikawimaawaadogena'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3PlObv: gimikawimaadogena'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+3PlObv: omikawaawaadogena'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+3PlObv: omikawaadogena'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+3PlObv: nimikawimaanaadogena'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+3PlObv: gimikawimaanaadogena'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+3PlObv: mikawimaadogena'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3PlObv: nimikawimaasii'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3PlObv: gimikawimaasiwaawaa'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3PlObv: gimikawimaasii'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+3PlObv: omikawaasiwaawaa'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+3PlObv: omikawaasii'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+3PlObv: nimikawimaasiwaanaa'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+3PlObv: gimikawimaasiwaanaa'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+3PlObv: mikawimaasiiwa'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3PlObv: nimikawimaa'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3PlObv: gimikawimaawaa'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3PlObv: gimikawimaa'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+3PlObv: omikawaawaa'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+3PlObv: omikawaa'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+3PlObv: nimikawimaanaa'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+3PlObv: gimikawimaanaa'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+3PlObv: mikawimaawa'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3PlObv: nimikawimaasiibane'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3PlObv: gimikawimaasiwaawaabane'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3PlObv: gimikawimaasiibane'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+3PlObv: omikawaasiwaawaabane'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+3PlObv: omikawaasiibane'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+3PlObv: nimikawimaasiwaanaabane'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+3PlObv: gimikawimaasiwaanaabane'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+3PlObv: mikawimaasiibane'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3PlObv: nimikawimaabane'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3PlObv: gimikawimaawaabane'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3PlObv: gimikawimaabane'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+3PlObv: omikawaawaabane'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+3PlObv: omikawaabane'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+3PlObv: nimikawimaanaabane'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+3PlObv: gimikawimaanaabane'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+3PlObv: mikawimaabane'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+3PlProx: omikaagosiinaawaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+3PlProx: omikaagosiinaawaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3PlProx: nimikawaasiidogenag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3PlProx: gimikawaasiwaawaadogenag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3PlProx: gimikawaasiidogenag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlObv+3PlProx: omikaagosiiwaadogena'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+3PlProx: omikaagosiiwaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+3PlProx: nimikawaasiwaanaadogenag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+3PlProx: gimikawaasiwaanaadogenag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+3PlProx: mikawaasiidogenag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+3PlProx: omikaagonaawaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+3PlProx: omikaagonaawaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3PlProx: nimikawaadogenag
